Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20173-125
Division; contracts; laws governing.

All contracts for the acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, and operation of airports or other air navigation facilities made by the division, either as the agent of this state, as the agent of any municipality, or as the agent of any person owning a privately owned public use airport, shall be made pursuant to the laws of this state governing the making of like contracts. When the acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, and operation of any airport, landing strip, or other air navigation facility is financed wholly or partially with federal money, the division, as agent of the state, of any municipality, or of any person owning a privately owned public use airport, may let contracts in the manner prescribed by the federal authorities, acting under the laws of the United States, and any rules or regulations made thereunder, notwithstanding any other state law to the contrary.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 7(3), p. 88;

Laws 1995, LB 609, § 8;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 23.
July 1, 2017